Missouri, session 2026, HB2154.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 161, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 161.672, to read as follows:
161.672. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adult student", an individual who:
(a) Resides in this state;
(b) Does not have a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate
issued by any state;
(c) Is twenty-one years of age or older; and
(d) Has fewer than twelve credits remaining or a total of two academic years
remaining to achieve a high school diploma in the state of Missouri. For purposes of this
paragraph, the term "credits remaining" shall not be construed to include credits
earned toward career and technical education courses or attainment of an industry-
recognized credential, technical skills assessment, or stackable credential;
(2) "Adult virtual program", a state-approved virtual course or full-time virtual
program offered by a school district or a public institution of higher education.
2. An adult student may enroll in an adult virtual program and shall be eligible
to enroll in the Missouri course access and virtual school program established in section
161.670.
3. (1) An adult virtual program under this subsection shall not be entitled to any
moneys paid to the school district as ordinary school revenue including, but not limited
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2154 2
to, local effort calculated under chapter 163. Such program provider shall be entitled to
receive a monthly state allocation from the department of elementary and secondary
education, derived solely from the state moneys the department collects and distributes
based on the state adequacy target as defined in section 163.011, in excess of any
minimum free public school funding and separate from any payment from the public
school fund as required by Article IX of the Constitution of Missouri. Subject only to
such restrictions, each successfully passed and completed course shall result in payment
to the program equal to fourteen percent of the state adequacy target.
(2) The total amount provided for an adult student enrolled in an adult virtual
program shall not exceed the state adequacy target.
4. No school district with an adult student enrolled in an adult virtual program
shall be required to report such adult student's information for purposes of a report
submitted under section 160.522 or 161.670.
✔